Arkansas, session 2025, HB2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:
*TNL439*
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1002 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1002. Education service cooperatives established — Functions.
(a)(1) The State Board of Education is authorized to may establish a
statewide system of not more than fifteen (15) multicounty education service
cooperatives of school districts.
(2) By the 2026-2027 school year, the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall assign each public school district and open-
enrollment public charter school to an education service cooperative within a
specific region based on regional availability or specialty services provided
by the education service cooperative.
(2)(3) Such Each education service cooperatives cooperative
shall be intermediate:
(A) Intermediate service units in the state's elementary
and secondary education system; and as such shall be eligible
(B) Eligible to receive and expend funds from state and
federal governments, public school districts, and other public or private
sources.
(b) Education service cooperatives established by this subchapter will
shall provide support and assistance to public school districts which choose
to use them assistance in:
(1) Meeting To meet or exceeding exceed accreditation standards
and equalizing optimize educational opportunities;
(2) Using By using educational resources more effectively
through cooperation among school districts; and
(3) Promoting In the promotion of coordination between public
school districts and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
division in order to provide services which that are consistent with the
needs identified by public school districts and the educational priorities of
the state as established by the General Assembly or the state board;
(4) By coordinating with the division to provide oversight and
monitoring of public school districts and open-enrollment public charter
schools to ensure compliance with state education requirements in statute and
rule; and
(5) In school improvement efforts.

04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1003 is repealed.
6-13-1003. Boundaries — Adjustments.
(a) The State Board of Education shall establish tentative boundaries
for the system of education service cooperatives authorized by this
subchapter.
(b) These education service cooperatives shall be established so that:
(1) They include at least three (3) but no more than nine (9)
counties;
(2) They include at least ten (10) but no more than thirty-five
(35) school districts;
(3) They include at least twenty thousand (20,000) pupils in
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) average daily membership;
(4) They include at least one (1) postsecondary education
institution; and
(5) There is no more than fifty (50) miles distance or
approximately one (1) hour driving time to the area's main offices for ninety
percent (90%) of the school districts.
(c)(1) The state board may make adjustments in the boundaries when
criteria such as minimum average daily membership and maximum driving
distances conflict.
(2) However, no more than four (4) of the areas formed may
contain fewer than twenty thousand (20,000) students.
(3) In no case shall any education service cooperative be
established with fewer than twelve thousand (12,000) pupils.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1004 is repealed.
6-13-1004. Requests for establishment of education service cooperative
— Requirements.
(a) Education service cooperatives shall be established when seventy-
five percent (75%) of the school districts in a proposed education service
cooperative area request such action by formal resolutions filed by the
school district boards of directors with the Commissioner of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(b) Each resolution shall, in addition to requesting establishment of
an education service cooperative, indicate by name or position that school
district's representative on the board of directors of the proposed education
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
service cooperative.
(c) Requests must be filed by seventy-five percent (75%) of the school
district boards of directors by May 1 if an education service cooperative is
to be established for the following school year.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1005 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1005. Alteration of boundaries.
(a) The State Board of Education, upon the request of one (1) or more
school district boards of directors, and consistent with the provisions of §
6-13-1003, may alter the boundaries of a proposed or operational education
service cooperative when it determines such alteration to be in the best
interest of the school districts in the education service cooperatives
involved In order to change membership within an education service
cooperative, a public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school may petition:
(1)(A) Another education service cooperative for membership in
the other education service cooperative.
(B) If the board of directors of the education service
cooperative petitioned by a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school under subdivision (a)(1) of this section votes by a
majority vote to accept the public school district's or open-enrollment
public charter school's petition for membership, the board of directors of
the education service cooperative shall notify the State Board of Education
of the membership change of the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school; or
(2)(A) The state board.
(B)(i) The state board shall consider a public school
district's or an open-enrollment public charter school's petition for
membership in another education service cooperative within forty-five (45)
days of receipt of the petition.
(ii) The state board may approve the petition if the
state board determines that the approval of the petition is in the best
interest of the public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school.
(b) Consistent with § 6-13-1003, a member of an education service
cooperative formed after January 1, 1984, under The Public School Educational
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
Cooperative Act of 1981, § 6-13-901 et seq., may not be moved to another
education service cooperative without that member's consent Each public
school district and open-enrollment public charter school may petition to
change the status of its membership within an education service cooperative
according to the procedures established in subsection (a) of this section
only one (1) time every three (3) years.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1006 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1006. Board of directors.
(a)(1)(A) Each education service cooperative shall be governed by a
board of directors consisting of one (1) representative appointed by a voted
resolution of each public school district board of directors within the
boundary of the education service cooperative and open-enrollment public
charter school governing body that is a member of the education service
cooperative during a legally held meeting of the school district board of
directors.
(B) The resolution required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of
this section shall be:
(i) Signed signed by both the president and the
secretary of a public school district board of directors or an open-
enrollment public charter school governing body; and
(ii) Forwarded annually by June 30 to the director of
the education service cooperative of which a school district is a member.
(2) A representative who is appointed under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section may include one (1) of the following:
(A) A superintendent of a public school district within
the boundary of an that is a member of the education service cooperative;
(B) An individual employed by a public school district
within the boundary of an that is a member of the education service
cooperative;
(C) A member of a public school district board of
directors within the boundary of an that is a member of the education service
cooperative; or
(D) A member of a community that is within the boundary of
an a public school district or served by an open-enrollment public charter
school that is a member of the education service cooperative.
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(b) The board of directors of each established education service
cooperative shall:
(1) Function as a public corporate body;
(2)(A) Meet, except as otherwise provided in § 6-13-1007
[repealed], at least eight (8) times each year.
(B)(i) Each meeting of a board of directors of an
education service cooperative shall be public.
(ii) The board of directors of each education
service cooperative shall make the minutes of each of its meetings publicly
available within a reasonable amount of time following the conclusion of a
meeting approval of the minutes; and
(3) Exercise general fiduciary responsibilities for the
education service cooperative with regard to policies and practices which
that guard the integrity of the agency and maintain public trust in its
operation;
(4) Elect an executive subcommittee that shall be comprised of a
chair, a vice chair, and a secretary who shall have the authority to:
(A) Oversee proper procedures of the education service
cooperative board of directors;
(B) Conduct personnel hearings;
(C) Conduct the evaluation of the education service
cooperative; and
(D) Make recommendations to the education service
cooperative board of directors; and
(5) If the education service cooperative is comprised of more
than twelve (12) public school districts and open-enrollment public charter
schools, include two (2) additional at-large officer positions to represent
the education service cooperative board of directors in personnel matters,
including without limitation disciplinary hearings and director evaluations.
(c) The first meeting of the board of directors shall be held within
thirty (30) days of January 1, 2024.
(d) At its first regular meeting, the board of directors shall elect a
chair.
(e)(1)(c)(1) The term for a representative appointed under this
section shall be two (2) years.
(2)(A) Each representative shall hold over after the expiration
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
of his or her term until his or her successor shall be is duly appointed and
qualified.
(B) A public school district board of directors within the
boundary of or an open-enrollment public charter school that is a member of
an education service cooperative may reappoint an outgoing representative
following the conclusion of his or her two-year term under this subsection.
(C) A vacancy shall be filled by the public school
district board of directors or open-enrollment public charter school
governing body that appointed the representative who previously served in the
currently vacant position according to the requirements established by
subsection (a) of this section.
(f)(d) Responsibilities of the an education service cooperative board
of directors, consistent with funds available, shall include without
limitation the following:
(1) Employment of a director of the education service
cooperative who shall serve as the nonvoting executive officer of the
education service cooperative board of directors;
(2) Establishment of policies and procedures for the operation
and management of the education service cooperative, which shall be in
written form and shall be filed with the State Board of Education Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education;
(3) Preparation of an annual budget estimating income and
expenditures for programs and services in accordance with procedures
established by the state board division;
(4) Receipt and expenditure of funds needed to provide programs
and services in the area of the education service cooperative;
(5) Making such surveys or other inquiries which may be required
to determine the service needs of school districts in the education service
cooperative and developing plans to provide such needed services;
(6) Employment, upon the recommendation of the director of the
education service cooperative, of such personnel as may be required to
provide the services requested by the public school districts in the area and
open-enrollment public charter schools based on the needs of the public
school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools and services
recommended by the division;
(7)(6) Implementation of policies established by the state board
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
division for the operation of education service cooperatives;
(8)(7) Cooperation with other education service cooperatives,
public school districts, open-enrollment public charter schools, and other
agencies to provide programs and services for children and adults residing
within their respective areas;
(9)(8) For facilities and buildings as may be required to
provide authorized programs and services:
(A) Renting, leasing, purchasing, constructing, or
receiving by gift;
(B) Borrowing from the Revolving Loan Fund under § 6-20-
818; or
(C) Borrowing from other sources for limited or unusual
circumstances upon approval of the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary
Education and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration;
and
(10)(9) Carrying out such other duties as may be required for
the efficient operation of the education service cooperative for which the
board of directors is responsible.
(g) Members of the board of directors shall be paid per diem and
mileage at the rate established by law for attending meetings of the board of
directors.
(h) In addition to evaluations required under § 6-13-1021, each board
of directors of an education service cooperative shall approve the strategic
plan that shall be developed by the education service cooperative and verify
outcomes submitted to the state Education Service Cooperative Committee,
including:
(1) Compile Compiling data that demonstrates what, if any,
improvement has been achieved with respect to the performance of students
enrolled in public school districts within the boundary of and open-
enrollment public charter schools that are members of the education service
cooperative in light of the programs and services offered by the education
service cooperative; and
(2) Annually by July 1, provide providing the data compiled
under subdivision (h)(1) (g)(1) of this section to each public school
district within the boundary of and open-enrollment public charter school
that is a member of the education service cooperative.
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(h) A representative of a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school under this section shall not be qualified to serve on
the executive committee of the board of directors of an education service
cooperative if the representative's public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school:
(1) Has been found to be in violation of the Standards for
Accreditation for Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts;
(2) Has a letter grade of "F";
(3) Is classified as in need of Level 5 — Intensive support
status; or
(4) Is identified as in fiscal distress under § 6-13-1027.
(i) If there are no representatives of a public school district or an
open-enrollment public charter school who are qualified to serve on the
executive subcommittee of an education service cooperative board of
directors, the state Education Service Cooperative Committee shall appoint a
member of the education service cooperative board of directors to preside as
chair and exercise the powers of the executive subcommittee.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1008 is repealed.
6-13-1008. Teacher center — Teacher center committee.
(a) Each education service cooperative shall establish a teacher
center which will provide, consistent with funds available, curriculum
development assistance, educational materials, and staff development services
to teachers within the school districts in the service area.
(b) A teacher center committee, composed of at least one (1)
representative from the staff of each school district, shall advise the
director and the governing body on the staffing, programs, and operation of
the teacher center.
(c) The governing body of each cooperative shall determine the initial
composition of the teacher center committee to achieve a balance of
elementary, middle school or junior high, and high school personnel and
assure that at least one-half (½), but not more than two-thirds (⅔), of the
members are classroom teachers.
(d) All positions on the committee shall be assigned to school
districts by lot.
(e) Each teacher must be elected by colleagues in his or her school
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
district, and each administrator or support person shall be appointed by the
superintendent.
(f) Initial terms shall be determined by lot for equal or nearly equal
periods of one (1), two (2), and three (3) years.
(g) Thereafter, terms shall be for three (3) years.
(h) The committee shall meet at least three (3) times per year.
(i) In the last meeting each year, positions represented by expiring
terms shall be reassigned by lot.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1009 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1009. Cooperative committees generally.
Each education service cooperative may establish other committees of
local public school personnel needed to keep its programs responsive to the
public schools it serves.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1010 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1010. Director.
(a) Each education service cooperative shall be administered by a
director who shall perform the following duties:
(1) Administer the programs and services of the education
service cooperative;
(2) Recommend the employment of professional and nonprofessional
personnel authorized by the education service cooperative's governing body
board of directors;
(3) Prepare the budget for adoption by the education service
cooperative's governing body board of directors;
(4) Direct expenditures of funds within the budget; and
(5) Perform other duties as required by the education service
cooperative's governing body board of directors and the policies and rules of
the State Board of Education;
(6) Coordinate with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education to provide onsite monitoring and support to meet the Standards for
Accreditation for Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts and division
rules; and
(7) Provide guidance and support to public school district
superintendents and open-enrollment public charter school directors.
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(b) The director of each education service cooperative shall:
(1) Hold an administrator's license and meet all requirements to
serve as a superintendent of public schools in the State of Arkansas; or
(2) Have an equivalent level of education and administrative
experience and obtain the approval of the state board.
(c) The governing body board of directors of any an education service
cooperative may enter into a contract with a director for a period not to
exceed three (3) years.
(d) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the state board may
remove permanently, reassign, or suspend on a temporary basis a director of
an education service cooperative pursuant to § 6-13-1022 if the education
service cooperative has received an "F" rating for three (3) consecutive
years.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1011 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1011. Personnel generally.
(a)(1) Personnel of education service cooperatives shall be employed
in accordance with laws, rules, and procedures applicable to the school
districts of this state An education service cooperative shall establish a
salary schedule in accordance with the needs and supports of personnel
provided and approved by the board of directors of the education service
cooperative.
(2) In lieu of a salary schedule, an education service
cooperative annually may submit to the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education a complete listing of all employees of the education service
cooperative and each employee's position, salary, and benefits.
(3) An education service cooperative shall post on its website a
complete listing of employees of the education service cooperative and each
employee's position, salary, and benefits.
(b) License requirements shall be the same as those expected of
persons holding similar positions in local public school districts.
(c) Termination or contract nonrenewal of education service
cooperative personnel shall be as provided by law for the public school
district or open-enrollment public charter school personnel.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1012 is amended to read as follows:
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
6-13-1012. Agency personnel.
With the approval of an education service cooperative's governing body
board of directors, the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education
may assign state educational agency personnel to that the education service
cooperative.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1013 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1013. Policies and rules.
(a) The State Board of Education shall develop such policies and may
promulgate rules as may be needed for the proper administration of this
subchapter consistent with the need to support and assist education service
cooperatives in the delivery of services to public school districts and open-
enrollment public charter schools and with prudent use of available human and
financial resources.
(b) The policies and If the state board establishes rules under
subsection (a) of this section, the rules shall include without limitation:
(1) The rules governing the operation Operation of an education
service cooperative within appropriate state and federal laws;
(2) Guidelines for settling possible disputes between public
school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools and in equity or
jurisdictional matters relating to shared assets and services;
(3) The obligation of an education service cooperative board of
directors for overseeing to oversee administrative and program expenditures;
and
(4) The fiscal distress status of an education service
cooperative under §§ 6-13-1027 — 6-13-1031.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1014 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1014. Sharing and coordination of activities — Liaison.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall encourage
sharing and coordination of activities among the education service
cooperatives.
(b)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
name a person to serve as liaison between the division and the education
service cooperatives appoint a state-level Education Service Cooperative
Committee to:
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(A) Review and approve strategic plans established by
education service cooperatives;
(B) Measure outcomes of strategic plans established by
education service cooperatives;
(C) Evaluate education service cooperatives; and
(D) Provide recommendations to the State Board of
Education based on the evaluation and letter grade of each education service
cooperative that receives an "F" rating for three (3) consecutive years.
(2) The committee shall consist of at least five (5) members.
(3) One (1) member of the committee shall:
(A) Serve as a direct liaison between the education
service cooperatives and the division; and
(c) This liaison shall provide (B) Provide information on resources
and programs and be the general contact person in the division for the
education service cooperatives.
(c) The commissioner may appoint a qualified public employee to serve
on the committee as part of his or her job duties.
(d) Members of the committee who are not public employees shall serve
without compensation but shall be eligible to receive reimbursement for
mileage and for expenses not to exceed the rate established for state
employees by state travel regulations.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1015 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1015. Liaison with postsecondary institutions.
(a) Each education service cooperative, in carrying out its programs
and services, shall cooperate with the various state-supported postsecondary
educational institutions located within its area.
(b) Each such postsecondary institution, within the availability of
funds and personnel, shall establish a liaison with the education service
cooperatives in its service area and assist them in all practical ways.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1016 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1016. Annual surveys and needs assessments.
(a)(1) Each An education service cooperative shall conduct annual
surveys and:
(A) Support member public school districts and open-
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
enrollment public charter schools in conducting needs assessments as part of
the strategic plan established by the education service cooperatives; and
(B)(i) Utilize data and analyses from member public school
districts and open-enrollment public charter schools to assist the education
service cooperative in its first priority of helping school districts improve
their educational programs and practices.
(ii) The data and analyses utilized in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be included in each education service
cooperative's strategic plan.
(2) A needs assessment under this section shall be conducted
regularly but not less than one (1) time every five (5) years.
(b) Such activities may A needs assessment under this section:
(1) Shall include an analysis of each member public school
district's and open-enrollment public charter school's state summative data,
teacher quality, and graduation rates; and
(2) May include without limitation written surveys, visits to
public schools to meet with local public school personnel, and other means to
identify local needs throughout the service area.
(c) Each education service cooperative shall work with the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education to conduct statewide surveys which that
complement, rather than duplicate, the work of the division.
(d) The objective of this section shall be to obtain statewide, area,
and local data with as little duplication as possible.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1017 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1017. Programs and services.
(a) The programs and services of each education service cooperative
shall be based upon the needs of the its member public school districts and
open-enrollment public charter schools included in its service area and upon
the educational priorities of the state.
(b) Each education service cooperative shall provide a teacher center
as its basic curriculum and staff development capability.
(c) Education service cooperatives may provide shared educational
programs and services such as needs assessment and school improvement
planning, staff development, curriculum development, itinerant teachers,
instructional materials, adult and vocational education, programs for gifted
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
and talented, education for children with disabilities, alternative
educational programs, secondary area vocational centers, community-based
education programs, and other services which that the State Board of
Education may approve or which that public school districts may support with
local funds.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1018 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1018. Participation of local school districts — Contracts.
(a) Each public school district within the service area of the and
open-enrollment public charter school that is a member of an education
service cooperative shall be entitled to participate in those programs and
services which that are fully supported by state funds.
(b) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school shall not deny or object to an education service cooperative that is
monitoring the public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school to ensure compliance with state laws and rules.
(b)(c) No A public school district or an open-enrollment public
charter school shall not be required to participate in any service.
(c)(d) School districts A public school district and an open-
enrollment public charter school may enter into contracts with the an
education service cooperative for services supported partially or completely
by local public school funds.
(d)(e) School Public school districts and open-enrollment public
charter schools within one (1) education service cooperative may also
contract for services with another education service cooperative.
(f)(1) It shall be the responsibility of a public school district or
an open-enrollment public charter school to monitor and evaluate programs
provided to the public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school by an education service cooperative.
(2) Outsourcing personnel or programs to an education service
cooperative does not waive the public school district's or open-enrollment
public charter school's responsibility to ensure the programs provided by an
education service cooperative satisfy applicable laws or rules.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1019 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1019. Funding of education service cooperatives.
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(a)(1) The state Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
provide funds to support the basic structure of the education service
cooperatives established under the provisions of this subchapter develop a
formula for the distribution of funds allocated for education service
cooperatives that includes without limitation a base amount for each
education service cooperative and an amount dependent on the number of
students in each member public school district and open-enrollment public
charter school.
(2) The formula developed under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section may include additional factors relevant to the composition of an
education service cooperative and the services it will provide, as determined
by the division.
(b) This structure shall include Funds provided to education service
cooperatives under this subchapter shall be used to support the basic
structure of the education service cooperatives established under the
provisions of this subchapter, including:
(1) Salaries and fringe benefits for a an education service
cooperative director, a teacher center coordinator, and support staff;
(2) Costs such as travel, utilities, rent, equipment, and
supplies; and
(3) Funds to support staff and curriculum development
activities; and
(4) Funds in an annual amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) for the travel expenses of itinerant personnel employed by
the education service cooperative to serve the part-time needs of local
school districts.
(c) When making a determination regarding additional funding under
this section, the division shall:
(1) Analyze and consider education service cooperative strategic
plans;
(2) Ensure funding is targeted to directly support public school
district and open-enrollment public charter school improvement or state
priorities; and
(3) Identify and consider measurable student and educator
outcomes for member public school districts and open-enrollment public
charter schools that can be used to evaluate the effectiveness of an
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
education service cooperative.
(c)(d) School Public school districts may contract with their
education service cooperative for services and part-time personnel to be
supported in whole or in part by local funds, but no a public school district
shall not be assessed a membership fee.
(d)(e) Categorical state funds or federal funds may also be assigned
to any an education service cooperative upon approval of its governing body
board of directors and under conditions set by the State Board of Education.
(e)(f) As a public agency, each education service cooperative shall be
eligible to receive and expend public and private funds.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1020 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1020. Policies and procedures — Expenditures, reports, and
audits.
(a) On or before August 31 of each year, each Each education service
cooperative shall file with the State Board of Education for the state
board's approval establish:
(1) The policies and procedures of the education service
cooperative, including without limitation the board of directors' policies
and procedures for overseeing the administrative and program expenditures of
the education service cooperative; and
(2) A record of the education service cooperative's employment
policies and practices for the year that includes without limitation:
(A) The race and sex of each person the education service
cooperative employed or terminated during the year;
(B) The race and sex of every person who sought employment
with the education service cooperative during the year; and
(C) The name of each person employed by the education
service cooperative during the year who is related by blood or marriage to
another employee or board member of the education service cooperative; and
(3)(A) A report of its receipts and expenditures made in
accordance with uniform accounting procedures adopted by the Commissioner of
Elementary and Secondary Education.
(B) The report shall contain without limitation:
(i) An itemization of administrative and program
expenditures; and
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(ii) The result of the board of directors' review of
the expenditures made under its oversight function.
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may prescribe
the forms and procedures for filing the information required by subsection
(a) of this section.
(c)(b) Each education service cooperative is subject to an annual
audit approved by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
(d)(1)(A)(c)(1) In an annual meeting of the an education service
cooperative board of directors, which must convene between May 15 and July
15, each education service cooperative shall report to its constituent member
public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools on the
year's operations.
(B)(2)(A) The report also shall include information on fiscal
distress under § 6-13-1027.
(B) A copy of the report required under this subdivision
(c)(1) shall be submitted to the Education Service Cooperative Committee by
August 1 each year.
(2) The education service cooperative shall supplement its
report with written reports to each school district and to the division on a
school-by-school, service-by-service accounting basis.
(e) Following the end of each fiscal year, any balances in particular
service accounts must be apportioned and returned to the schools involved or
credited to their accounts for the following year.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1021 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1021. Evaluations — Performance rating.
(a)(1) Each education service cooperative shall be evaluated during
the 2012-2013 school year, and at least once within each five-year period, on
a schedule established by the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(2) All active education service cooperatives must be visited by
an evaluation committee of not more than nine (9) persons shall have an on-
site visit by a member of the Education Service Cooperative Committee one (1)
time each year.
(3) An education service cooperative that receives a rating of
"D" or "F" shall be evaluated during the year following the receipt of the
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
"D" or "F" rating.
(b)(1)(A) Each evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, an
investigation of user satisfaction, without limitation:
(1) A review of the strategic plan established by an education
service cooperative and outcomes;
(2) Member public school district and open-enrollment public
charter school student academic outcomes and progress; service
(3) Service adequacy, extent of local financial support,;
(4) Fiscal stability staff;
(5) Staff qualifications,; and performance
(6) Performance and administration effectiveness.
(B) The final evaluation, including any self-evaluation,
shall be included in the annual report to the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education, § 6-13-1020, and made available on the website of the
education service cooperative.
(2)(A) The evaluation criteria shall be developed
collaboratively between the division and the director of each education
service cooperative.
(B) The evaluation criteria shall be fully implemented by
September 1, 2012.
(c)(1) The report of this committee shall be filed with the education
service cooperative visited, with its constituent school districts, and with
the State Board of Education.
(2) The state board shall acknowledge receipt of the report and
comment on any deficiencies identified in the report that should be corrected
for the education service cooperative to remain eligible for base funding.
(3) The report shall identify each education service cooperative
as being in one (1) of the following category levels, based on the
evaluation:
(A) “Level 5”, education service cooperative of
excellence;
(B) “Level 4”, education service cooperative exceeding
standards;
(C) “Level 3”, education service cooperative meeting
standards;
(D) “Level 2”, education service cooperative on alert; or
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(E) “Level 1”, education service cooperative in need of
immediate improvement.
(d)(1)(c)(1) The intent of this the evaluation procedure under this
section is to provide a means for public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools to express their concerns about the operation of their
education service cooperative and to ensure that each education service
cooperative remains alert aware of and responsive to the needs of the local
public schools it serves.
(2) An education service cooperative that receives a performance
category level of Level 1 shall be reevaluated during the evaluation cycle
the following year.
(3) For all education service cooperatives that receive a
performance category level of Level 1 for two (2) consecutive years, the
division shall:
(A) Withhold base funding to the education service
cooperative; or
(B) Take over administration of the education service
cooperative An education service cooperative that has a rating of a "D" or an
"F" shall develop an improvement plan that is submitted to the committee to
take specified actions to improve performance and demonstrate improved
outcomes.
(d) If an education service cooperative has received a rating of "F"
for three (3) consecutive years, the State Board of Education may take one
(1) or more of the following remedial measures:
(1) Remove, reassign, or suspend the education service
cooperative director;
(2) Appoint an education service cooperative director who may:
(A) Operate the education service cooperative under the
supervision and approval of the commissioner;
(B) Terminate employees of the education service
cooperative in accordance with state and federal law; and
(C) Restructure the internal operations of the education
service cooperative;
(3) Designate the committee as the acting board of directors for
the education service cooperative; and
(4) Direct the commissioner to assume some or all of the
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
authority of the education service cooperative board of directors as
necessary to operate the education service cooperative.
(e) If the state board directs the commissioner to assume the
authority of the education service cooperative board of directors under
subdivision (d)(4) of this section, it may also direct the commissioner to
appoint an advisory board to act in an advisory capacity to the commissioner
regarding the powers and duties maintained by the commissioner.
(e)(f) The division shall promulgate rules necessary for implementing
this section.
(f)(1) For each evaluation, the commissioner shall appoint the
committee and designate its chairperson.
(2) The committee shall include the following from outside the
boundary of the education service cooperative being evaluated:
(A) A division staff member;
(B) A teacher;
(C) An administrator;
(D) A college staff member; and
(E) A present or former staff member of an area education
service agency.
(3) In addition, the committee shall include from within the
education service cooperative's area:
(A) A member of the school district board of directors;
(B) A representative of business and industry; and
(C) A school parent from each of two (2) school districts.
(4) Each education service cooperative shall pay the reasonable
costs of its evaluation.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1022 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1022. Dissolution of education service cooperative.
(a) After 1990, the The State Board of Education shall be authorized
to may dissolve any an education service cooperative upon the request of a
majority of its school district boards of directors or upon the
recommendation of the evaluation committee provided for in § 6-13-1021:
(1) The request of a majority of its member public school
district board of directors or open-enrollment public charter school
governing body;
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(2) The recommendation of an evaluation conducted pursuant to §
6-13-1021;
(3) An education service cooperative receiving a rating of "F"
for three (3) consecutive years; or
(4) An education service cooperative classified as in fiscal
distress.
(b)(1) A dissolved education service cooperative's area member public
school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools shall be assigned
to one (1) or more adjacent education service cooperatives, the provisions of
§ 6-13-1003 notwithstanding, with the dissolved education service
cooperative's base funding apportioned to all remaining education service
cooperatives in the state.
(2) Upon the dissolution of an education service cooperative,
the division shall revise the funding formula established under § 6-13-1019.
(c) After payment of debts, the assets of a dissolved education
service cooperative shall be distributed to the member public school
districts and open-enrollment public charter schools in its service area
based on each school district's or open-enrollment public charter school's
three-quarter average daily membership for the immediately preceding school
year.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1023 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-1023. Technology training center — Technology coordinator.
(a) Consistent with funds available and upon a majority vote of the
members present and voting, the board of directors of each education service
cooperative established under this subchapter is authorized to may establish
a technology training center and employ a technology coordinator who has
demonstrated expertise in computer technology and staff development.
(b) The duties of the technology coordinator at such a technology
training center established under this section shall include, but not be
limited to, without limitation the following:
(1) To provide staff development for personnel of member schools
public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools;
(2) To assist member schools public school districts and open-
enrollment public charter schools with determining technology needs and types
of computer hardware and software necessary to meet those needs;
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(3) To assist with technology system analysis and local network
design;
(4) To provide member schools public school districts and open-
enrollment public charter schools with information on technology standards
and specifications;
(5) To develop and coordinate a technology training center
located at the education service cooperative;
(6) To coordinate information with the Arkansas Public School
Computer Network, the Instructional Microcomputer Project for Arkansas
Classrooms, and the Governor's Technology Task Force so that member schools
public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools will be
informed on technological activity in the state; and
(7) To assist with requests for proposal development and bid
analysis so that member schools public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools will be better able to spend funds for technology; and
(8) To assist with coordinated efforts to address cyber
incidents and develop appropriate response teams.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1025 is repealed.
6-13-1025. Mathematics and science resource center — Mathematics and
science coordinator.
(a) Consistent with funds available and upon a majority vote of the
members present and voting, the board of directors of each education service
cooperative established under this subchapter is authorized to establish a
mathematics and science resource center and to employ a mathematics and
science coordinator who has demonstrated expertise in mathematics and science
content, in pedagogy, and in staff development.
(b) The duties of the mathematics and science coordinator at the
mathematics and science resource center shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(1) Providing mathematics and science staff development for and
individual technical assistance to personnel of member schools;
(2) Assisting member schools with determining mathematics and
science curricula, with instruction, and with assessment of needs and
resources necessary to meet those needs;
(3) Enhancing curricula and instruction using technology;
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(4) Providing member schools with information for curriculum
alignment with mathematics and science standards and state frameworks;
(5) Developing and coordinating a mathematics and science
resource center located at the education service cooperative; and
(6) Assisting with the development of requests for proposals for
teacher enhancement in mathematics and science.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1027(e), concerning requirements for
an education service cooperative that receives a classification of fiscal
distress, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Within two (2) weeks following the date the education service
cooperative receives the final classification by the state board of fiscal
distress, the education service cooperative shall:
(1) Notify in writing each member public school district in its
service area and open-enrollment public charter school that the education
service cooperative is classified as being in fiscal distress; and
(2) File with the division a fiscal distress plan under § 6-13-
1028.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1027(g), concerning an annual report
provided by an education service cooperative that receives a classification
of fiscal distress, is amended to read as follows:
(g) The education service cooperative shall include in the annual
report to constituent member public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools under § 6-13-1020(d) the progress the education
service cooperative has made on its fiscal distress plan.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-13-1032. Education service cooperative rating system — Established.
(a) The education service cooperative rating system established by
this section shall be a multiple-measures approach that shall include without
limitation:
(1) Academic achievement on the annual statewide student
assessment of all students in member public school districts and open-
enrollment public charter schools;
04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439

HB2002
(2) Student growth on the annual statewide student assessment of
all students in member public school districts and open-enrollment public
charter schools;
(3) School-level graduation rate or rates of all students in
member public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools;
and
(4) Any other measures identified by the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education.
(b) An education service cooperative rating shall not be calculated by
averaging the school letter grades of member public school districts and
open-enrollment public charter schools.
(c) Indicators included or considered as part of the education service
cooperative rating system shall:
(1) Allow for meaningful differentiation in education service
cooperative performance; and
(2) Be valid, reliable, comparable, and applicable statewide.
(d) The State Board of Education may take one (1) or more actions
under § 6-13-1021 when an education service cooperative receives a rating of
"F" for three (3) consecutive years.
(e) The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.
















04/09/2025 8:19:07 AM TNL439